Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 12. Mergers and Share Exchanges.
§ 13.1-719.1.
Formation of a holding company.

As used in this section:“Constituent corporation” means a corporation which, from the incorporation of the holding company until consummation of a merger governed by this section, was at all times the sole direct parent of the holding company and whose shares are converted into shares of the holding company in such merger.“Holding company” means a corporation which, from its incorporation until consummation of a merger governed by this section, was at all times a direct wholly owned subsidiary of the constituent corporation and whose shares are issued in such merger in exchange for the shares of the constituent corporation.“Indirect subsidiary” means a corporation which, from its incorporation until consummation of a merger governed by this section, was at all times a direct wholly owned subsidiary of the holding company.

Unless its articles of incorporation otherwise provide, a constituent corporation may merge an indirect subsidiary into itself, or may merge itself into an indirect subsidiary, without the approval of the shareholders of the constituent corporation or the board of directors or shareholders of the indirect subsidiary, if:

Such constituent corporation and indirect subsidiary are the only parties to the merger;

The provisions in the articles of incorporation and bylaws of the constituent corporation and the holding company immediately before the effective time of the merger are identical as they relate to:

The designation, number, and par value of each class and series of shares that are authorized, and the preferences, rights, and limitations of each class and series of shares;

Any terms of the shares that are dependent upon facts objectively ascertainable outside of the articles of incorporation or that vary among the holders of the same class or series;

The preemptive right of the shareholders to acquire unissued shares, provided, however, that if the constituent corporation was formed on or before December 31, 2005, and its articles of incorporation do not deny the preemptive right of its shareholders, and the holding company was formed after December 31, 2005, the articles of incorporation of the holding company must provide that its shareholders have the preemptive right to acquire the holding company’s unissued shares to the same extent the shareholders of the constituent corporation had a preemptive right to acquire unissued shares of the constituent corporation;

The definition, limitation, and regulation of the powers of the corporation, its directors, and shareholders;

The management of the business and regulation of the affairs of the corporation; and

For purposes of subdivision 2 c, shares include any warrants, rights, or options to acquire any such shares or any security or other obligation of the corporation convertible into any such shares or into warrants, rights, or options to acquire any such shares;

Each share or fraction of a share of the constituent corporation outstanding immediately prior to the effective time of the merger is converted in the merger into a share or equal fraction of a share of the holding company having the same preferences, rights, and limitations as the share or fraction of a share of the constituent corporation being converted in the merger;

Each right to acquire shares of the constituent corporation outstanding immediately prior to the effective time of the merger is converted in the merger into a right to acquire shares of the holding company having the same preferences, rights, and limitations as the right to acquire shares of the constituent corporation being converted in the merger; and

The directors of the constituent corporation become or remain the directors of the holding company upon the effective time of the merger.

Notwithstanding any provision in this chapter to the contrary, a plan of merger adopted pursuant to this section may include:

If the indirect subsidiary is the survivor:

An amendment or restatement of the indirect subsidiary’s articles of incorporation to change the name of the indirect subsidiary to a name that satisfies the requirements of this chapter; and

A provision that the shares of the holding company into which the shares of the constituent corporation are converted in the merger may be represented by the share certificates that previously represented shares of the constituent corporation, if the holding company adopts the former name of the constituent corporation by filing articles of amendment that are effective immediately following consummation of the merger; and

To change the name of the constituent corporation to a name that satisfies the requirements of this chapter;

To delete any existing provisions that authorize the issuance of or relate to multiple classes or series of shares and to add one or more provisions that authorize a new, single class of shares with unlimited voting rights in lieu thereof;

To delete any existing provision that provides for staggering the terms of directors pursuant to §

13.1-678

; or

To make any change permitted by §

13.1-706

;

A provision that the shares of the holding company into which the shares of the constituent corporation are converted in the merger may be represented by the share certificates that previously represented shares of the constituent corporation, if the constituent corporation adopts a new name in the merger that is distinguishable upon the records of the Commission and if the board of directors of the holding company, acting pursuant to §

13.1-706

, adopts the former name of the constituent corporation by filing articles of amendment that are effective immediately following consummation of the merger.

If the constituent corporation is the survivor:

Articles of merger filed with respect to a merger authorized by this section shall include a statement that the plan of merger did not require approval by the shareholders of the constituent corporation or by the board of directors or shareholders of the indirect subsidiary because the merger was authorized by this section and that the conditions specified in subsection B have been satisfied.

Except as provided in this section, a merger governed by this section shall comply with the provisions of this article applicable to mergers generally.

From and after the effective time of a merger adopted by a constituent corporation pursuant to this section:

To the extent the restrictions of §

13.1-725.1

or

13.1-728.2

applied to the constituent corporation and its shareholders immediately prior to the merger, such restrictions shall apply to the holding company and its shareholders immediately after the effective time of the merger as though it were the constituent corporation, and all shares of the holding company acquired in the merger shall for purposes of §§

13.1-725.1

and

13.1-728.2

be deemed to have been acquired at the time that the shares of the constituent corporation converted in the merger were acquired, and provided further that:

Any shareholder who immediately prior to the effective time of the merger was not an interested shareholder within the meaning of §

13.1-725

shall not solely by reason of the merger become an interested shareholder of the holding company; and

Any shares which immediately prior to the effective time of the merger were not interested shares within the meaning of §

13.1-728.1

shall not solely by reason of the merger become interested shares of the holding company.

To the extent a shareholder of the constituent corporation immediately prior to the effective time of the merger had standing to institute or maintain a derivative proceeding on behalf of the constituent corporation, consummation of the merger shall not be deemed to limit or extinguish such standing.

To the extent a voting trust authorized by §

13.1-670

, a voting agreement authorized by §

13.1-671

, a shareholder agreement authorized by §

13.1-671

.1, a proxy or any similar agreement or instrument applied to the constituent corporation, its shares or its shareholders immediately prior to the merger, such voting trust, voting agreement, shareholder agreement, proxy or other agreement or instrument shall apply to the holding company and its shares and shareholders immediately following consummation of the merger to the same extent that it applied to the constituent corporation and its shares and shareholders immediately prior to consummation of the merger.

a.

An amendment or restatement of the constituent corporation’s articles of incorporation:

b.

A provision that one or more of the directors of the constituent corporation immediately prior to the effective time of the merger will no longer be directors of the constituent corporation immediately following the effective time of the merger; and

History.

2006, c. 363; 2015, c. 611; 2019, c. 734.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 611 substituted “wholly owned” for “wholly-owned” and “effective time” for “effective date” throughout the section; substituted “As used in” for “In” at the beginning of subsection A; in subdivision C 2 c, inserted “if the board of directors of” and “acting pursuant to §

13.1-706

”; deleted “of this section” following “B” in subsection D; and in subdivisions F 1 and F 3, substituted “immediately prior to” for “at the effective date of.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subdivision B 2, substituted “immediately before” for “at”; in subdivision B 2 f., deleted “of this subsection” preceding “shares include”; and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 273 (2007).

§ 13.1-720.
Articles of merger or share exchange.

After a plan of merger or share exchange has been adopted and approved as required by this chapter, the corporation shall deliver to the Commission for filing articles of merger or share exchange signed on behalf of each party to the merger or share exchange, that shall set forth:

The plan of merger or share exchange;

The date the plan of merger or share exchange was adopted or approved by each domestic corporation that was a party to the merger or share exchange;

If the plan of merger or share exchange required approval by the shareholders of a domestic corporation that was a party to the merger or share exchange, either:

A statement that the plan was approved by the unanimous consent of the shareholders; or

A statement that the plan was submitted to the shareholders by the board of directors in accordance with this chapter and was duly approved by the shareholders in the manner required by this chapter and by the articles of incorporation;

If the plan of merger or share exchange was adopted by the board of directors without approval by the shareholders of a domestic corporation that was a party to the merger or share exchange, a statement that the plan of merger or share exchange was duly approved by the board of directors including the reason shareholder approval was not required and, in the case of a merger pursuant to §

13.1-719.1

, the additional statements required by subsection D of §

13.1-719.1

; and

As to each foreign corporation or foreign eligible entity that was a party to the merger or share exchange, a statement that the participation of the foreign corporation or foreign eligible entity was duly authorized as required by its organic law.

Articles of merger or share exchange shall be delivered to the Commission for filing by the survivor of the merger or the acquiring corporation in a share exchange. If the Commission finds that the articles of merger or share exchange comply with the requirements of law and that all required fees have been paid, it shall issue a certificate of merger or share exchange. Articles of merger or share exchange filed under this section may be combined with any filing required under the organic law of any domestic eligible entity involved in the transaction if the combined filing satisfies the requirements of both this section and the other organic law.

In the case of a merger pursuant to §

13.1-719

or

13.1-719.1

:

The articles shall recite that the merger is being effected pursuant to §

13.1-719

or

13.1-719.1

, as the case may be; and

The articles need only be signed on behalf of the parent corporation or the constituent corporation, as the case may be.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 13.1-72, 13.1-73; 1956, c. 428; 1968, c. 114; 1975, c. 500; 1985, c. 522; 1992, c. 575; 2000, c. 53; 2003, c. 597; 2005, c. 765; 2006, c. 363; 2009, c. 216; 2010, c. 782; 2015, c. 611; 2019, c. 734.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 53 substituted “plan” for “amendment” in subdivision A 3 a.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 597, in subsection A, substituted “entity” for “corporation,” and inserted “executed by each party to the merger or share exchange”; inserted subdivision C 1; and inserted the subdivision C 2 designation.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 rewrote subsection A; added “the names of the parties to the merger or share exchange and, for each party that is a foreign corporation or eligible entity, the name of the state or country under whose laws it is incorporated or formed” to the end of subdivision A 1; rewrote subdivisions A 2 and A 3; substituted “approved” for “adopted” in subdivision A 3 a; added subdivisions A 4 and A 5; and added the first and last sentences in subsection B.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 363 inserted “and, in the case of a merger pursuant to §

13.1-719.1

, the additional statements required by subsection D of §

13.1-719.1

” in subdivision A 4.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 216, in subsection A, added subdivision A 3; redesignated former subdivisions A 3 through 5 as subdivisions A 4 through 6, and in subdivision A 5, substituted “was adopted by the directors without approval” for “did not require approval” and “that the plan of merger or share exchange was duly approved by the directors including the reason shareholder approval” for “to that effect including the reason approval”; and substituted “parent corporation” for “surviving corporation” in subdivision C 1.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 782 substituted “signed” for “executed” in subsection A; redesignated former subdivisions C 1 and C 2 as subdivisions C 2 and C 3, respectively; and added subdivision C 1.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 611 inserted “or §

13.1-719.1

” in the first sentence of subsection C; inserted “or §

13.1-719.1

, as the case may be; and” at the end of subdivision C 1; substituted “signed” for “executed” and added “or the constituent corporation, as the case may be” at the end of subdivision C 2; deleted former subdivision C 3, which read “The certificate of merger shall not be deemed a part of the articles of incorporation”; and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734 rewrote the section.

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia corporate and business law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 697 (2000).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

12A M.J. Limited Liability Companies, § 30.

§ 13.1-721.
Effect of merger or share exchange.

When a merger becomes effective:

The domestic or foreign corporation or eligible entity that is designated in the plan of merger as the survivor continues or comes into existence as the case may be;

The separate existence of every domestic or foreign corporation or eligible entity that is merged into the survivor ceases;

All property owned by, and every contract right possessed by, each domestic or foreign corporation or eligible entity that merges into the survivor is vested in the survivor without transfer, reversion or impairment;

All debts, obligations, and liabilities of each domestic or foreign corporation or eligible entity that is merged into the survivor are debts, obligations, or liabilities of the survivor;

The name of the survivor may, but need not be, substituted in any pending proceeding for the name of any party to the merger whose separate existence ceased in the merger;

If the survivor is a domestic corporation, the articles of incorporation and bylaws of the survivor are amended to the extent provided in the plan of merger;

The articles of incorporation and bylaws of a survivor that is a domestic corporation created by the merger become effective;

The shares of each domestic or foreign corporation that is a party to the merger, and the eligible interests in a domestic or foreign eligible entity that is a party to the merger, that are to be converted under the plan of merger into shares, other securities, eligible interests, obligations, rights to acquire shares, other securities, or eligible interests, cash, other property or any combination of the foregoing, are converted, and the former holders of such shares or eligible interests are entitled only to the rights provided to them in the plan of merger or to any rights they may have under Article 15 (§

13.1-729

et seq.) or the organic law governing the foreign corporation or domestic or foreign eligible entity;

Except as provided by law or the plan of merger, all the rights, privileges, franchises, and immunities of each entity that was a party to the merger, other than the survivor, are the rights, privileges, franchises, and immunities of the survivor; and

If the survivor existed before the merger:

All the property and contract rights of the survivor remain its property and contract rights without transfer, reversion, or impairment;

The survivor remains subject to all its debts, obligations, and other liabilities; and

Except as provided by law or the plan of merger, the survivor continues to hold all of its rights, privileges, franchises, and immunities.

When a share exchange becomes effective, the shares or eligible interests in the acquired entity that are to be exchanged for shares and other securities, eligible interests, obligations, rights to acquire shares, other securities, eligible interests, cash, other property, or any combination of the foregoing, are entitled only to the rights provided to them in the plan of share exchange or to any rights they may have under Article 15 (§

13.1-729

et seq.) or under the organic law governing the acquired entity.

Except as otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation of a domestic corporation or the organic law governing or organic rules of a foreign corporation or a domestic or foreign eligible entity, the effect of a merger or share exchange on interest holder liability is as follows:

A person who becomes subject to a new interest holder liability in respect of an entity as a result of a merger or share exchange shall have that new interest holder liability only in respect of interest holder liabilities that arise after the merger or share exchange becomes effective.

If a person had interest holder liability with respect to a party to the merger or the acquired entity before the merger or share exchange becomes effective with respect to shares or eligible interests of such party or acquired entity that were (i) exchanged in the merger or share exchange, (ii) were canceled in the merger, or (iii) the terms and conditions of which relating to interest holder liability were amended pursuant to the merger:

The merger or share exchange does not discharge that prior interest holder liability with respect to any interest holder liabilities that arose before the merger or share exchange becomes effective.

The provisions of the organic law governing any entity for which the person had that prior interest holder liability shall continue to apply to the collection or discharge of any interest holder liabilities preserved by subdivision C 2 a, as if the merger or share exchange had not occurred.

The person shall have such rights of contribution from other persons as are provided by the organic law governing the entity for which the person had that prior interest holder liability with respect to any interest holder liabilities preserved by subdivision C 2 a, as if the merger or share exchange had not occurred.

The person shall not, by reason of such prior interest holder liability, have interest holder liability with respect to any interest holder liabilities that arise after the merger or share exchange becomes effective.

If a person has interest holder liability both before and after a merger becomes effective with unchanged terms and conditions with respect to the entity that is the survivor by reason of owning the same shares or eligible interests before and after the merger becomes effective, the merger has no effect on such interest holder liability.

A share exchange has no effect on interest holder liability related to shares or eligible interests of the acquired entity that were not exchanged in the share exchange.

Upon a merger becoming effective, a foreign corporation or a foreign eligible entity that is the survivor of the merger is deemed to:

Appoint the clerk of the Commission as its agent for service of process in any proceeding (i) to enforce the rights of shareholders of each domestic corporation that was a party to the merger who exercise appraisal rights or (ii) based on a cause of action against a nonsurviving domestic corporation arising during the time it was in existence under the laws of the Commonwealth, which service of process shall be made on the clerk in accordance with §

12.1-19.1

; and

Agree that it will promptly pay the amount, if any, to which such shareholders are entitled under Article 15 (§

13.1-729

et seq.).

No corporation that is required by law to be a domestic corporation, may, by merger, cease to be a domestic corporation, but every such corporation, even though a corporation of some other state, the United States or another country, shall also be a domestic corporation of the Commonwealth.

Except as provided in the organic law governing a party to a merger or in its articles of incorporation or organic rules, the merger does not give rise to any rights that a third party would have upon a dissolution, liquidation, or winding up of that party. The merger does not require a party to the merger to wind up the affairs of that party and does not constitute or cause its dissolution, termination, or cancellation.

A bequest, devise, gift, grant, or promise contained in a will or other instrument of donation, subscription, or conveyance that is made to an entity that is a party to a merger that is not the survivor and that takes effect or remains payable after the merger inures to the survivor.

A trust obligation that would govern property if transferred to a nonsurviving entity applies to property that is transferred to the survivor after a merger becomes effective.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-74; 1956, c. 428; 1962, c. 44; 1975, c. 500; 1985, c. 522; 2005, c. 765; 2019, c. 734; 2020, c. 1226.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective July 1, 2021.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 substituted “When a merger becomes effective” for “When a merger takes effect” in subsection A; rewrote subdivisions A 1 through A 6; added present subdivisions A 7 and A 8; rewrote subsections B and C; and added subsection D.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subdivision A 3, deleted “except to the extent that assignment would violate a contractual prohibition on assignment by operation of law” preceding “every contract,” and inserted “transfer” preceding “reversion”; in subdivision A 4, inserted “debts, obligations, and” preceding “liabilities,” and substituted “debts, obligations, or liabilities of” for “vested in”; rewrote subdivisions A 6 and 7, which read: “The articles of incorporation or organic document of the survivor is amended to the extent provided in the plan of merger; 7. The articles of incorporation or organic document of a survivor that is created by the merger becomes effective; and” in subdivision A 8, inserted “domestic or foreign” preceding “eligible entity” twice, substituted “shares” for “securities,” and substituted “or the organic law governing the foreign corporation or” for “of this chapter or the organic law of the”; added subdivisions A 9 and 10; in subsection B, substituted “or eligible interests in the acquired entity” for “of each domestic or foreign corporation,” and substituted “or under the organic law governing the acquired entity” for “of this chapter”; added subsection C; redesignated former subsections C and D as D and E, respectively; in subdivision D 1, inserted “which service of process shall be made on the clerk in accordance with §

12.1-19.1

” following “appraisal rights”; in subdivision D 2, deleted “of this chapter” at the end; added subsections F through H; and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1226, effective July 1, 2021, in subdivision D 1, inserted the clause (i) and (ii) designations, added “or” at the end of clause (i), and added “based on a cause of action against a nonsurviving domestic corporation arising during the time it was in existence under the laws of the Commonwealth” at the beginning of clause (ii).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1A M.J. Actions, § 26.

§ 13.1-721.1.
Abandonment of a merger or share exchange.

Unless otherwise provided in the plan of merger or share exchange or in the laws under which a foreign corporation or a domestic or foreign eligible entity that is a party to a merger or a share exchange is organized or by which it is governed, after a plan of merger or share exchange has been adopted and approved as required by this article, and at any time before the certificate of merger or share exchange has become effective, the plan may be abandoned by a domestic corporation that is a party to the plan without action by its shareholders in accordance with any procedures set forth in the plan or, if no such procedures are set forth in the plan, in the manner determined by the board of directors, subject to any contractual rights of other parties to the plan of merger or share exchange.

If a merger or share exchange is abandoned after the articles of merger or share exchange have been filed with the Commission but before the certificate of merger or share exchange has become effective, in order for the certificate of merger or share exchange to be abandoned, all parties to the plan of merger or share exchange shall sign a statement of abandonment and deliver it to the Commission for filing prior to the effective time and date of the certificate of merger or share exchange. If the Commission finds that the statement of abandonment complies with the requirements of law, it shall issue a certificate of abandonment, effective as of the date and time the statement of abandonment was received by the Commission, and the merger or share exchange shall be deemed abandoned and shall not become effective.

The statement of abandonment shall contain:

The name of each domestic and foreign corporation and eligible entity that is a party to the merger and its jurisdiction of formation and entity type;

When the survivor will be a domestic corporation or a domestic nonstock corporation created by the merger, the name of the survivor set forth in the articles of merger;

The date on which the articles of merger or share exchange were filed with the Commission;

The date and time on which the Commission’s certificate of merger or share exchange becomes effective; and

A statement that the merger or share exchange is being abandoned in accordance with this section.

History.

2005, c. 765; 2010, c. 782; 2019, c. 734; 2020, c. 1226; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 734, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 2020 c. 1226, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) amending and reenacting §§

13.1-615

,

13.1-615.1

,

13.1-616

,

13.1-632

,

13.1-721.1

, and

13.1-722.2

through

13.1-722.13

of the Code of Virginia; (ii) amending the Code of Virginia by adding in Chapter 9 of Title 13.1 an article numbered 1.1, consisting of sections numbered

13.1-614.1

through

13.1-614.8

, and by adding sections numbered

13.1-712.1

,

13.1-722.1:1

,

13.1-722.7:1

, and

13.1-722.12:1

; and (iii) repealing §§

13.1-722.4

,

13.1-722.7

, and

13.1-722.14

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective July 1, 2021.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to July 1, 2021, with respect to the name of a stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to July 1, 2021, to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, effective July 1, 2021, in subsection A, inserted “of merger or share exchange” following “plan,” and inserted “plan of” following “parties to the”; rewrote subsection B, which read: “If a merger or share exchange is abandoned under subsection A after articles of merger or share exchange have been filed with the Commission but before the certificate of merger or share exchange has become effective, a statement that the merger or share exchange has been abandoned in accordance with this section, signed on behalf of a party to the merger or share exchange, shall be delivered to the Commission for filing prior to the effective date of the certificate of merger or share exchange. Upon filing, the statement shall take effect and the merger or share exchange shall be deemed abandoned and shall not become effective”; added subsection C; and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1226, effective July 1, 2021, in the first sentence of subsection B, substituted “abandoned” for “canceled” and “state of abandonment and deliver it to” for “request for a certificate of cancellation and deliver it with”; substituted “abandonment” for “cancellation” in the introductory language of subsection C.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, effective July 1, 2021, in subsection A, substituted the first occurrence of “the plan” for “a plan” and “to the plan without action by its shareholders” for “thereto without action by shareholders” and deleted “of merger or share exchange” preceding “or, if no such procedures”; rewrote subdivision C 1, which read: “The name of the corporation”; and inserted a new subdivision C 2 and redesignated the remaining subdivisions. For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.

§§ 13.1-722,
13.1-722.1.
Repealed by Acts 2005, c. 765, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former § 13-722, relating to merger or share exchange with foreign corporation, or domestic or foreign limited liability company, partnership, limited partnership or business trust, was derived from Code 1950, § 13.1-71; 1956, c. 428; 1985, c. 522; 1987, c. 191; 1992, c. 575; 1997, c. 190; 2003, c. 340.

Former § 13.1-722.1, relating to merger of stock and nonstock corporations, was enacted by Acts 1994, c. 646, and amended by Acts 2002, c. 497 and 2003, c. 597.